District of Columbia statutes.
1-612.03b

Donor leave.

(a)

An employee shall be entitled to up to 30 days of leave to serve as an organ donor, and up to 7 days of leave to serve as a bone marrow donor, without loss or reduction in pay, leave, or credit for time of service, in a calendar year.

(b)

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall only apply if the employee is a volunteer donor, and any compensation received by the employee is limited to costs and expenses associated with organ or bone marrow donations.

(c)

The Mayor shall prescribe rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1203b
as added June 25, 2002, D.C. Law 14-148, § 2, 49 DCR 4231